Utah statutes.
48-2c-1508.   Members and managers restricted to professionals.

A company organized to render professional services:

(1)  may include members, managers, and employees authorized under the laws of the jurisdiction where they reside to provide similar services;

(2)  may include members who are not licensed or registered by the state to render those professional services to the extent allowed by the applicable licensing act relating to those professional services;

(3)  may render professional services in this state only through its members, managers, and employees who are licensed or registered by this state to render those professional services; and

(4)  shall have all of the other powers provided under Section 48-2c-110.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

